apertium-deu.deu.dix
<pardef n="kl/immen__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>immend</l>    <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immen</l>     <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immen</l>     <r>immen<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immen</l>     <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immen</l>     <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immen</l>     <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immen</l>     <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>imme</l>      <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>imme</l>      <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>imme</l>      <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immest</l>    <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immet</l>     <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>imm</l>       <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immst</l>     <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immten</l>    <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immten</l>    <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immten</l>    <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immten</l>    <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immte</l>     <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immte</l>     <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immte</l>     <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immte</l>     <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immtest</l>   <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immtest</l>   <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immtet</l>    <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immtet</l>    <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immt</l>      <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immt</l>      <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immt</l>      <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ommen</l>     <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ommen</l>     <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ömmen</l>     <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ömmen</l>     <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ömme</l>      <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ömme</l>      <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ömmest</l>    <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ömmet</l>     <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>omm</l>       <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>omm</l>       <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ommst</l>     <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ommt</l>      <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kl/ingen__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>angen</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>angen</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ängen</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ängen</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änge</l>      <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änge</l>      <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ängest</l>    <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änget</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ang</l>       <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ang</l>       <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>angst</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>angt</l>      <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingend</l>    <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingen</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingen</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingen</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingen</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingen</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingen</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inge</l>      <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inge</l>      <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inge</l>      <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingest</l>    <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inget</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingst</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingt</l>      <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingt</l>      <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingt</l>      <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="klimmen">         <i>kl</i><par n="kl/immen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="klingen">         <i>kl</i><par n="kl/ingen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ringen">          <i>r</i><par n="kl/ingen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zwingen">         <i>zw</i><par n="kl/ingen__vblex"/></e>
